North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1. Adult Care Homes.
§ 131D-9.
Immunization of employees and residents of adult care homes.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an adult care home licensed under this Article shall require residents and employees to be immunized annually against influenza virus and shall require residents to also be immunized against pneumococcal disease.

Upon admission, an adult care home shall notify the resident of the immunization requirements of this section and shall request that the resident agree to be immunized against influenza virus and pneumococcal disease.

(b1)

An adult care home shall notify every employee of the immunization requirements of this section and shall request that the employee agree to be immunized against the influenza virus.

An adult care home shall document the annual immunization against influenza virus and the immunization against pneumococcal disease for each resident and each employee, as required under this section. Upon finding that a resident is lacking one or both of these immunizations or that an employee has not been immunized against influenza virus, or if the adult care home is unable to verify that the individual has received the required immunization, the adult care home shall provide or arrange for immunization. The immunization and documentation required shall occur not later than November 30 of each year.

For an individual who becomes a resident of or who is newly employed by the adult care home after November 30 but before March 30 of the following year, the adult care home shall determine the individual’s status for the immunizations required under this section, and if found to be deficient, the adult care home shall provide the immunization.

No individual shall be required to receive vaccine under this section if the vaccine is medically contraindicated, or if the vaccine is against the individual’s religious beliefs, or if the individual refuses the vaccine after being fully informed of the health risks of not being immunized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commission for Public Health shall have the authority to adopt rules to implement the immunization requirements of this section.

As used in this section, “employee” means an individual who is a part-time or full-time employee of the adult care home.

History.

2000-112, ss. 1, 2; 2007-182, s. 1.3.

§ 131D-10.
Adult care home rated certificates.

Rules adopted by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission for issuance of certificates to adult care homes shall contain a rating based, at a minimum, on the following:

Inspections and substantiated complaint investigations conducted by the Department to determine compliance with licensing statutes and rules. Specific areas to be reviewed include:

Admission and discharge procedures.

Medication management.

Physical plant.

Resident care and services, including food services, resident activities programs, and safety measures.

Residents’ rights.

Sanitation grade.

Special Care Units.

Use of physical restraints and alternatives.

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall issue ratings to a facility pursuant to the rules adopted under this section based on both of the following:

Inspections and investigations of complaints conducted pursuant to

G.S. 131D-2.11

and

G.S. 131D-26

that revealed noncompliance with statutes and rules.

The facility’s participation in any quality improvement programs approved by the Department.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-184, s. 5, effective October 1, 2017.

(c1)

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall issue a star rating to a facility within 45 days from the date the Division mails the survey or inspection report to the facility, except when a timely request has been made by the facility under

G.S. 131D-2.11

for informal dispute resolution. If a facility makes a timely request for informal dispute resolution, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall issue a star rating to the facility within 15 days from the date the Division mails the informal dispute decision to the facility.

Adult care homes shall display the rating certificate in a location visible to the public. Certificates shall include the Web site address for the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, which can be accessed for specific information regarding the basis of the facility rating. For access by the public on request, adult care homes shall also maintain on-site a copy of information provided by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, regarding the basis of the facility rating.

The Department shall make available free of charge to the general public on the Division of Health Service Regulation Web site each facility rating and specific information regarding the basis for calculating each facility rating.

History.

2007-544, s. 3(b); 2017-184, s. 5.